North Carolina, session 2025, SB56.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE AND SCOPE OF ACT
SECTION 1.1. Title. – This act shall be known as "The Disaster Recovery Act of
2025 – Part I."
SECTION 1.2. Maximum Amounts; Effectuate Savings. – The appropriations and
allocations made in this act are for maximum amounts necessary to implement this act. Savings
shall be effected where the total amounts appropriated or allocated are not required to implement
this act.
SECTION 1.3. Scope. – Unless otherwise provided, Section 2 of this act applies to
the North Carolina counties in the affected area, as defined in Section 1.4 of this act.
SECTION 1.4. Definitions. – Unless otherwise provided, the following definitions
apply in this act:
(1) Affected area. – The counties designated before, on, or after the effective date
of this act under a major disaster declaration by the President of the United
States under the Stafford Act (P.L. 93-288) as a result of Hurricane Helene.
(2) Helene Fund. – The Hurricane Helene Disaster Recovery Fund established in
Section 4.1 of S.L. 2024-51.
(3) SERDRF. – The State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Fund
established in G.S. 166A-19.42.

PART II. SERDRF FUNDING
SECTION 2. Intent to Transfer Disaster Relief Funds. – It is the intent of the General
Assembly to transfer funds from the SERDRF to the Helene Fund for further disaster relief and
recovery assistance.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S56-v-1*